Utah statutes.
39-1-14.   Adjutant general -- Drawing vouchers for property damage.
The adjutant general shall, with the approval of the governor, draw vouchers
on the state appropriation for the National Guard, payable to the United
States, to cover any damage to the United States property charged to the
state, when such damage shall have been properly adjudged to be payable by the
state.
